Utah statutes.
45-1-201.   Newspapers "of general circulation" -- Requirements.

No newspaper shall be deemed a newspaper having general circulation for the purpose of publishing any notice, advertisement or publication of any kind required by law, unless it has a bona fide subscription list of not less than 200 subscribers in this state, and shall have been published for not less than 18 months, and shall have been admitted in the United States mails as second-class matter for 12 months; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall invalidate the publication in a newspaper which has simply changed its name or ownership, or has simply moved its place of publication from one part of the state to another, or suspended publication on account of fire, flood or unavoidable accident not to exceed 10 weeks; provided further, that nothing in this chapter shall apply to any county wherein no newspaper has been published the requisite length of time.

